Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.380

Director's authority to contract—Records and fees.

In order to fulfill the purposes of chapter 528, Laws of 2009, the director is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry or other entities designated by the nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter.

[ 2009 c 528 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—License requirement—Implementation—2009 c 528: See notes following RCW 19.146.010.